Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3081.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; SANKOFA EMPOWERMENT CENTER.new text end new text begin (a) $2,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of human services for a grant to Rebound, Inc., a nonprofit organization serving justice-involved youth, for the development, establishment, and operation of the Sankofa Empowerment Center. The money must be used for property acquisition, facility construction, staffing, program development, and operational costs necessary to provide culturally responsive services to Black youth with a history of juvenile justice or child welfare involvement. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end new text begin (b) Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 16B.98, subdivision 14, the commissioner of human services shall retain $0 for administrative costs. new text end new text begin (c) Rebound, Inc. shall submit a report to the commissioner of human services and the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over youths and human services by January 15, 2027, detailing the use of funds, the number of youth and young adults served, program outcomes, partnerships developed, and recommendations for future funding and expansion. new text end